Maine, session 132, LD633.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3144, sub-§2, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 120, §1, is
amended to read:
E. Procedures for deployment of internal and external resources during an emergency,
including field employees, supplies and equipment needed; and
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3144, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 120, §1, is
amended to read:
F. Provisions to ensure the safety of the employees and external contractors engaged
in emergency response efforts.; and
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3144, sub-§2, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Procedures for the identification of and outreach plans regarding customers who
have a documented need of electricity for essential medical equipment, including an
apnea monitor for an infant, a cuirass respirator, a hemodialysis machine, an
intravenous feeding machine, an intravenous infusion machine, an oxygen
concentrator, a positive-pressure respirator, a respirator or ventilator, a rocking bed
respirator, an aspirator, a tank-type respirator or any other medical equipment
necessary for an individual whose medical condition is likely to be significantly
triggered or exacerbated by a continued loss of electricity in a way that will adversely
impact that individual's health.
Page 1 - 132LR0828(02)